New York, session 2025-2026, A1939.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 107 of the agriculture and markets 2 law, as amended by section 1 of part T of chapter 59 of the laws of 3 2010, is amended to read as follows: 4 4. This article shall not apply to any dog confined to the premises of 5 any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of breeding or 6 raising dogs for profit and licensed as a class A dealer under the 7 Federal [Laboratory] Animal Welfare Act, provided such dealer sells dogs 8 exclusively to USDA registered research facilities, or research facili- 9 ties with a Public Health Services approved Animal Welfare Assurance 10 from the Office of Laboratory Animal Welfare at the National Institute 11 of Health and to agencies of the federal government that are exempt from 12 the Animal Welfare Act and foreign entities lawfully engaged in 13 research. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05224-01-5